Louisiana, session 2026, HB215.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
6 Section 1. Code of Civil Procedure Article 3421(1) is hereby amended and reenacted
7 to read as follows:
8 Art. 3421. Small successions defined
9 A small succession, within the meaning of this Title, is any of the following:
10 (1) The succession of a person who died domiciled in Louisiana and who died
11 leaving property with a gross value of one hundred twenty-five two hundred
12 thousand dollars or less valued as of the date of death.
13 * * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.